Missouri, session 2026, SB1762.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:

There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or
items stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated, for the
period beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:

Section 13.005. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
For the payment of real property leases, utilities, systems furniture, and
structural modifications, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 13.005, 13.010, and
13.015, further provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is
allowed between Section 13.005 to Section 13.010, further
provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between and within departments and one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between federal funds within this
section, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 13.025
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education Expense
and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $378,717
From Vocational Rehabilitation Fund (1104). ..............................2,264,607

SB 1762 2
From DESE – Federal Fund (1105)......................................... 19,932
From Child Care and Development Block Grant Federal Fund (1168).............. 94,470
From Assistive Technology Federal Fund (1188).............................. 50,193
From Deaf Relay Service and Equipment Distribution Program Fund
(1559).......................................................... 35,377
From Charter Public School Commission Revolving Fund (1860)................. 13,545
From Assistive Technology Loan Revolving Fund (1889). ...................... 15,140

For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
Expense and Equipment
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155)...........................1,680,009
From Special Employment Security Fund (1949)............................. 283,769

For the Department of Revenue
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 725,810

For the Department of Revenue
For the State Lottery Commission
Expense and Equipment
From Lottery Enterprise Fund (1657). ..................................... 565,879

For the Office of Administration
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,053,281
From State Facility Maintenance and Operation Fund (1501).................... 483,928
From Office of Administration Revolving Administrative Trust Fund
(1505)......................................................... 495,494

For the Ethics Commission
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 152,112

For the Department of Agriculture
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 300,239
From Department of Agriculture – Federal Fund (1133).......................... 4,362
From Grain Inspection Fee Fund (1647). .................................... 51,203
From Petroleum Inspection Fund (1662)..................................... 30,421
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970)..................................... 2,457

SB 1762 3


For the Department of Natural Resources
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 609,964
From DNR – Federal Fund (1140)......................................... 428,952
From Missouri Air Emission Reduction Fund (1267)........................... 41,291
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415). .................................... 108,529
From Historic Preservation Revolving Fund (1430). ........................... 37,789
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500). .................................. 112,667
From Natural Resources Protection Fund (1555). ............................. 12,110
From Natural Resources Protection – Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount Fund (1568). ......................................... 124,749
From Solid Waste Management – Scrap Tire Subaccount Fund (1569)............. 36,630
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570). ............................... 184,819
From Natural Resources Protection – Air Pollution Asbestos Fee
Subaccount (1584)................................................ 26,708
From Petroleum Storage Tank Insurance Fund (1585). ......................... 49,980
From Underground Storage Tank Regulation Program Fund (1586). .............. 15,337
From Natural Resources Protection – Air Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount (1594)............................................... 319,766
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613)........................................ 165,130
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614). ................................ 35,524
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676)....................................... 177,420
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679). ................................... 132,697

For the Department of Economic Development
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 13,771
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274). ......................1

For the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Expense and Equipment
From Division of Finance Fund (1550)...................................... 97,375
From Insurance Examiners Fund (1552)...................................... 8,176
From Insurance Dedicated Fund (1566). ..................................... 9,527
From Manufactured Housing Fund (1582). .................................. 22,756
From Public Service Commission Fund (1607)..............................1,101,124
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689). ............................. 2,676
From Office of Public Counsel Fund (1508)................................. 127,245

SB 1762 4

For the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 29,516
100 From DOLIR – Commission on Human Rights – Federal Fund (1117). ............ 13,904
101 From DOLIR Administrative Fund (1122). ................................... 5,360
102 From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652). ................................ 492,508
103 From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948)................ 100,009
104
105 For the Department of Public Safety
106 Expense and Equipment
107 From General Revenue Fund (1101).............................................3
108 From State Emergency Management – Federal Fund (1145). .................... 10,039
109 From Veterans’ Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304). ........... 159,554
110 From Division of Alcohol and Tobacco Control Fund (1544). .................. 153,073
111 From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus Fund
112 (2350)......................................................... 228,191
113
114 For the Department of Public Safety
115 For the State Highway Patrol
116 Expense and Equipment
117 From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 247,526
118 From Department of Public Safety – Federal Fund (1152). ...................... 10,716
119 From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644)..............3,645,961
120
121 For the Department of Public Safety
122 For the Missouri Gaming Commission
123 Expense and Equipment
124 From Gaming Commission Fund (1286).................................... 539,334
125
126 For the Department of the National Guard
127 Expense and Equipment
128 From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 61,329
129 From Adjutant General – Federal Fund (1190)..............................1,474,146
130 From Federal Drug Seizure – Federal Fund (1194)............................. 29,124
131
132 For the Department of Corrections
133 Expense and Equipment
134 From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................7,813,957
135 From Working Capital Revolving Fund (1510)............................... 332,708

SB 1762 5

136
137 For the Department of Mental Health
138 Expense and Equipment
139 From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,815,014
140
141 For the Department of Health and Senior Services
142 Expense and Equipment
143 From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................3,712,440
144 From Department of Health and Senior Services – Federal Fund (1143). .........2,946,763
145 From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Stimulus Fund
146 (2350)........................................................1,613,680
147
148 For the Department of Social Services
149 Expense and Equipment
150 From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................13,567,729
151 From Department of Social Services – Federal Fund (1610). ..................6,631,085
152
153 For the General Assembly
154 Expense and Equipment
155 From General Revenue Fund (1101).............................................1
156
157 For the Lieutenant Governor
158 Expense and Equipment
159 From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 63,118
160 From Missouri Arts Council Trust Fund (1262). .............................. 82,327
161
162 For the Attorney General
163 Expense and Equipment
164 From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 622,760
165 From Attorney General – Federal Fund (1136)............................... 181,457
166 From Merchandising Practices Revolving Fund (1631). ....................... 155,836
167 From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652). ................................ 115,706
168 From Workers’ Compensation – Second Injury Fund (1653).................... 115,706
169 From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676)......................................... 9,737
170 From Missouri Office of Prosecution Services Fund (1680)...................... 94,875
171
172 For the Secretary of State
173 Expense and Equipment
174 From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 336,312

SB 1762 6

175 From Local Records Preservation Fund (1577)................................ 55,279
176
177 For the State Auditor
178 Expense and Equipment
179 From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 17,527
180
181 For the Judiciary
182 Expense and Equipment
183 From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,804,395
184 From Judiciary – Federal Fund (1137)....................................... 27,572
185 From Judiciary Education and Training Fund (1847). .................... 175,913
186 Total.............................................................$64,195,848

Section 13.010. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
For operation of state-owned facilities, utilities, systems furniture, and
structural modifications, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 13.005, 13.010, and
13.015, further provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is
allowed between and within departments and one hundred
percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between federal funds
within this section, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 13.025
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education Expense
and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $630,856
From Vocational Rehabilitation Fund (1104). ..............................1,556,274
From Elementary and Secondary Education – Federal Fund (1105)............... 521,008
From Child Care and Development Block Grant – Federal Fund (1168). .......... 270,723
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 364,763
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155)............................ 702,903

For the Department of Revenue
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,874,090
For the Office of Administration
Expense and Equipment

SB 1762 7
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................9,230,121
From State Facility Maintenance and Operation Fund (1501).................... 283,822
From Children’s Trust Fund (1694)......................................... 36,796

For the Department of Agriculture
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 234,471
From Department of Agriculture – Federal Fund (1133)......................... 53,358
From Animal Health Laboratory Fee Fund (1292). ............................ 61,437
From Animal Care Reserve Fund (1295)...................................... 7,809
From Commodity Council Merchandising Fund (1406).......................... 4,288
From Single Purpose Animal Facilities Loan Program Fund (1408). ............... 5,091
From State Milk Inspection Fee Fund (1645). ................................. 5,607
From Grain Inspection Fee Fund (1647). .................................... 33,926
From Petroleum Inspection Fund (1662).................................... 163,153
From Missouri Wine and Grape Fund (1787). ................................ 13,844
From Agriculture Development Fund (1904). ................................. 2,529
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970)................................... 399,933

For the Department of Natural Resources
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,387,798
From DNR – Federal Fund (1140)......................................... 389,632
From Missouri Air Emission Reduction Fund (1267)........................... 65,957
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500). .................................. 108,272
From Natural Resources Protection – Water Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount Fund (1568). ......................................... 176,482
From Solid Waste Management – Scrap Tire Subaccount Fund (1569)............. 14,535
From Solid Waste Management Fund (1570). ................................ 29,308
From Metallic Minerals Waste Management Fund (1575). ....................... 5,560
From Natural Resources Protection – Air Pollution Asbestos Fee
Subaccount Fund (1584). ........................................... 4,694
From Natural Resources Protection – Air Pollution Permit Fee
Subaccount Fund (1594). ......................................... 124,238
From Soil and Water Sales Tax Fund (1614). ................................ 47,586
From Energy Set-Aside Program Fund (1667). ............................... 42,206
From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676)........................................ 48,999
From Safe Drinking Water Fund (1679). ................................... 195,846
From Mined Land Reclamation Fund (1906). ................................ 14,782

SB 1762 8

From Energy Futures Fund (1935)........................................... 1,518

For the Department of Conservation
Expense and Equipment
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609). .............................. 331,036

For the Department of Economic Development
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 342,691
From Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue Fund (1274). ................ 127,422
From Department of Economic Development Administrative Fund
(1547).......................................................... 40,938

For the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Expense and Equipment
From Division of Credit Unions Fund (1548)................................. 43,218
From Division of Finance Fund (1550)..................................... 297,218
From Insurance Examiners Fund (1552)..................................... 48,113
From Insurance Dedicated Fund (1566). ................................... 500,892
From Public Service Commission Fund (1607)............................... 186,099
From Professional Registration Fees Fund (1689). ........................... 374,291

For the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 182,350
From DOLIR – Commission on Human Rights – Federal Fund (1117). ........... 117,244
From DOLIR Administrative Fund (1122). ................................. 645,402
From Division of Labor Standards – Federal Fund (1186). ...................... 10,363
From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652). ................................ 815,128
From Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund (1948)...............1,297,930
From Special Employment Security Fund (1949).............................. 97,766

For the Department of Public Safety
100 Expense and Equipment
101 From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 850,548
102 From Veterans’ Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304). ........... 229,087
103 From Division of Alcohol and Tobacco Control Fund (1544). .................. 187,699
104 For the Department of Public Safety

SB 1762 9

105 For the State Highway Patrol
106 Expense and Equipment
107 From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 900,526
108 From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644)..............1,218,858
109
110 For the Department of Public Safety
111 For the Missouri Gaming Commission
112 Expense and Equipment
113 From Gaming Commission Fund (1286).................................... 123,496
114
115 For the Department of Corrections
116 Expense and Equipment
117 From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,869,199
118
119 For the Department of Mental Health
120 Expense and Equipment
121 From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,374,415
122 From Department of Mental Health – Federal Fund (1148). .................... 337,968
123 From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)........................................ 11,057
124
125 For the Department of Health and Senior Services
126 Expense and Equipment
127 From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,006,124
128 From Department of Health and Senior Services – Federal Fund
129 (1143)........................................................1,623,928
130
131 For the Department of Social Services
132 Expense and Equipment
133 From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................9,241,103
134 From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199). .................. 188,141
135 From Health Initiatives Fund (1275)........................................ 24,466
136 From Department of Social Services – Federal Fund (1610). ..................1,338,228
137 From Department of Social Services Educational Improvement Fund
138 (1620)........................................................... 9,580
139
140 For the Governor
141 Expense and Equipment
142 From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 813,046
143

SB 1762 10

144 For the Lieutenant Governor
145 Expense and Equipment
146 From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 81,663
147
148 For the General Assembly
149 Expense and Equipment
150 From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,830,718
151
152 For the Secretary of State
153 Expense and Equipment
154 From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,095,599
155 From Secretary of State’s Technology Trust Fund Account (1266). ............... 19,250
156 From Local Records Preservation Fund (1577)................................ 10,440
157 From Investor Education and Protection Fund (1829)........................... 39,479
158
159 For the State Auditor
160 Expense and Equipment
161 From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 516,245
162
163 For the Attorney General
164 Expense and Equipment
165 From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,808,307
166 From Attorney General – Federal Fund (1136)............................... 228,719
167 From Natural Resources Protection – Water Pollution Permit Fee
168 Subaccount Fund (1568). .......................................... 34,158
169 From Workers’ Compensation Fund (1652). ................................. 61,916
170 From Workers’ Compensation Second Injury Fund (1653)....................... 62,172
171 From Hazardous Waste Fund (1676)........................................ 14,291
172
173 For the State Treasurer
174 Expense and Equipment
175 From State Treasurer's General Operations Fund (1164). ...................... 302,114
176
177 For the Judiciary
178 Expense and Equipment
179 From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 398,387
180 Total.............................................................$56,423,243

Section 13.015. To the Office of Administration

SB 1762 11
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
For operation of institutional facilities, utilities, systems furniture, and
structural modifications, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 13.005, 13.010, and
13.015, further provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is
allowed between and within departments and one hundred
percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between federal funds
within this section, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 13.025
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education Expense
and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$5,550,513

For the Department of Mental Health
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................26,614,542
From Department of Mental Health – Federal Fund (1148). ...................2,389,059

For the Department of Health and Senior Services
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)........................................ 14,702
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other Fund
(1143).......................................................... 11,712

For the Department of Social Services
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................4,694,828
From Department of Social Services – Federal Fund (1610). ..................1,078,052

For the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................... 7,983
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644).......... 24,967
Total.............................................................$40,386,358

Section 13.020. To the Office of Administration
For the Office of Administration

SB 1762 12
For the collection of costs associated with state owned, institutional,
and state leased space occupied by non-state agencies, provided
no flexibility is allowed to or from this section
Expense and Equipment
From Office of Administration Revolving Administrative Trust Fund
(1505).......................................................$1,528,026

Section 13.025. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101)............................................$1
(cid:252)